Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5432.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 departments and agencies and the legislative branch for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 609,639,500 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 609,639,500 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 37,162,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 300,000 Total other state restricted revenues 222,931,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 349,245,100 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,100,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,100,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,100,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Education/skilled trades/career readiness programs $ 2,100,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,100,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 2,100,000 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 882,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 882,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 882,700 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Charter school transparency database $ 132,700 Michigan core curriculum 750,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 882,700 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 882,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 104. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 18,101,800 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 18,101,800 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 2,620,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 15,325,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 156,800 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Americorps and office of climate and energy $ 796,800 Contaminated site remediation and redevelopment programs 15,000,000 Energy programs 2,305,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 18,101,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Federal funds 640,000 Inflation reduction act 1,980,000 Special revenue funds: Clean Michigan initiative fund ? response activities 15,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Energy efficiency and renewable energy revolving loan fund 325,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 156,800 Sec. 105. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 69,272,800 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 69,272,800 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 31,489,200 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 7,620,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 30,162,900 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Children's campus renovation $ 1,494,600 Community impact center 2,500,000 Complex medical condition center 16,900 Cranial hair prosthesis 56,600 Drinking water declaration of emergency 1,674,500 Firearm safety and violence prevention 1,800,000 Healthy communities grant 2,000,000 Immunization program 553,500 Information technology services and projects 18,000,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Local food infrastructure grant 2,992,500 Maternal-fetal medicine programming 3,000,000 Mental health services and community outreach 1,427,800 Mobile outreach clinic 700,000 Native American health services 3,500,000 Nurse workforce development 4,000,000 Opioid response activities 7,067,200 Prenatal and infant support program 18,489,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 69,272,800 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Capped federal revenues 1,500,000 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 19,989,200 Total other federal revenues 10,000,000 Special revenue funds: Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund 7,067,200 Total other state restricted revenue 553,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 30,162,900 Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 230,516,300 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 230,516,300 Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 300,000 Total other state restricted revenues 11,244,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 218,972,300 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Agricultural tourism hub redevelopment $ 2,000,000 Community enhancement grants 102,611,500 Community museum grants 15,779,700 Downtown development 150,000 Infrastructure grants 63,478,800 Language access 308,000 Michigan innovation fund 11,244,000 Office of future mobility and electrification 2,000,000 Office of global Michigan 1,000,000 Prosperity 800,000 Symphony orchestra grants 1,923,100 Talent and growth 29,221,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 230,516,300 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Private revenues 300,000 21st century jobs trust fund 11,244,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 218,972,300 Sec. 107. LEGISLATURE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 369,600 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 369,600 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 369,600 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Michigan veterans' facility ombudsman $ 368,600 National association dues 1,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 369,600 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 369,600 Sec. 108. DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 58,053,600 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 58,053,600 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 3,053,600 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 55,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Bureau of construction codes $ 3,053,600 Michigan indigent defense commission grants 50,000,000 Renewable energy and electrification infrastructure enhancement and development 5,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 58,053,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOE-OEERE, multiple grants 3,053,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 55,000,000 Sec. 109. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,150,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,150,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 3,300,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,850,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Body cameras for conservation officers $ 400,000 Cultural resource management 200,000 Fisheries habitat improvement grants 50,000 Fisheries resource management 1,600,000 General law enforcement 100,000 Marketing and outreach 600,000 Nature awaits 2,200,000 Wildlife management 1,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,150,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Game and fish protection account 2,700,000 State park improvement account 600,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,850,000 Sec. 110. DEPARTMENT OF STATE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,325,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,325,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 7,575,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 750,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Election administration and services $ 7,200,000 Information technology services and projects 750,000 Operations 375,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 8,325,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Election administration support fund 7,200,000 Transportation administration collection fund 375,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 750,000 Sec. 111. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 192,204,800 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 192,204,800 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 159,310,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 32,894,500 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Information technology investment fund $ 31,500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Make it in Michigan 159,310,300 Menstrual products 1,214,500 Office of the state employer 180,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 192,204,800 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Make it in Michigan competitiveness fund 159,310,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 32,894,500 Sec. 112. STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,713,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,713,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 10,213,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,500,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Passenger transportation services $ 848,100 School zone automated speed enforcement pilot project 2,500,000 Service initiatives 4,131,900 System operations management 5,233,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,713,700 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Comprehensive transportation fund 4,980,000 State trunkline fund 5,233,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,500,000 Sec. 113. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,949,200 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,949,200 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 8,342,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,606,300 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Casino gaming control operations $ 1,584,900 Gaming control information technology services and projects 1,382,700 Local finance 26,300 Lottery information technology services and projects 1,050,100 Lottery operations 1,950,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan infrastructure council 250,000 Office of revenue and tax analysis 530,000 Supervision of the general property tax law 1,800,000 Treasury operations information technology services and projects 2,375,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,949,200 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Delinquent tax collection revenue 2,375,200 Fantasy contest fund 407,100 Internet gaming fund 1,707,000 Internet sports betting fund 853,500 State lottery fund 3,000,100 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,606,300 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 is $572,176,700.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $61,943,500.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Drinking water declaration of emergency $ 53,500 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Immunization program 57,600 Opioid response activities 500,500 DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS Michigan indigent defense commission grants $ 50,000,000 DEPARTMENT OF STATE Election administration and services $ 7,200,000 STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT Service initiatives $ 4,131,900 TOTAL $ 61,943,500 Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. Funds appropriated in part 1 must be allocated and expended in a manner consistent with federal rules and regulations. Sec. 204. Funds appropriated in part 1 are subject to applicable federal audit and reporting requirements. Prompt action shall be taken if instances of noncompliance are identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding. If any instance of noncompliance is identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding, the state budget director shall take necessary and immediate action to rectify it. The state budget director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees and the senate and house fiscal agencies when an instance of noncompliance is identified. Sec. 205. As used in this act, "standard report recipients" means the senate and house appropriations subcommittees with jurisdiction over the budget for the department, agency, or other 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 entity for which the appropriation is made, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. Sec. 206. Expenditures from appropriations under this act are limited to the total amount of appropriations, or suballocations of appropriations, authorized for the same purposes under 2024 PA 121, 2025 PA 15, and 2025 PA 22 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, minus any expenditures made under those appropriations or suballocations for the purposes authorized under those acts. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Sec. 301. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan core curriculum, the department shall, in collaboration with the confederation of Michigan tribal education departments, continuously design, implement, and evaluate professional learning and optional curriculum modules for the purpose of teaching Michigan Indigenous tribal history including the history of Indian boarding schools in Michigan as described in the Michigan core curriculum standards for grades 8 to 12. Sec. 302. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for charter school transparency database, the department shall develop and maintain an interactive website where parents and community members can access information about their charter schools. Sec. 303. As used in sections 301 and 302, "department" means the department of education. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 501. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal and infant support program, the department shall allocate 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 $18,489,200.00 of TANF revenue for programs that are intended to improve the economic stability of households with very young children. (2) In allocating the funds referenced in subsection (1), the department shall give preference to programs that demonstrate the following: (a) Effectiveness in improving the economic stability of households with pregnant women at a minimum of 20 weeks gestation, and with young children. (b) Partnerships with local health care providers and nonprofit human service agencies that provide for improved maternal and infant health outcomes. (c) Compliance with TANF requirements established by the Administration for Children and Families within the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (3) By September 30 of the current fiscal year, the department, through agreements with contracted implementing agencies, shall report to the standard report recipients information through June 30 of the current fiscal year on the aggregated demographic data of all program recipients regardless of underlying funding source. The report must include, but is not limited to, aggregated recipient data from contracted implementing agencies with each contracted implementing agency providing the age, race, ethnicity, Hispanic or Latino origin, federal poverty level, funding source, and zip codes of all program recipients. (4) As used in this section, "TANF" means part A of subchapter IV of the social security act, 42 USC 601 to 619. Sec. 502. Funds appropriated in part 1 for opioid response activities must be allocated in the same manner as an amount 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriated for opioid response activities as described in section 917 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for opioid response activities described under section 917 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 503. Funds appropriated in part 1 for drinking water declaration of emergency must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for drinking water declaration of emergency as described in section 1306 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for drinking water declaration of emergency described under section 1306 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 504. Funds appropriated in part 1 for complex medical condition center must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for complex medical condition center as described in section 1934 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for complex medical condition center described under section 1934 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 505. Funds appropriated in part 1 for cranial hair prosthesis must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for cranial hair prothesis as described in section 1936 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for cranial hair prothesis described under section 1936 of article 6 of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 2024 PA 121. Sec. 506. Funds appropriated in part 1 for healthy communities grant must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for healthy communities grant as described in section 1943 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for healthy communities grant described under section 1943 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 507. Funds appropriated in part 1 for local food infrastructure grant must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for local food infrastructure grant as described in section 1951 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for local food infrastructure grant described under section 1951 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 508. Funds appropriated in part 1 for firearm safety and violence prevention must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for firearm safety and violence prevention as described in section 1954 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for firearm safety and violence prevention described under section 1954 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 509. Funds appropriated in part 1 for Native American health services must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for Native American health services as described in section 1958 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for Native American health services described under section 1958 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 510. Funds appropriated in part 1 for community impact center must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for community impact center as described in section 1963 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for community impact center described under section 1963 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 511. Funds appropriated in part 1 for children's campus renovation must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for children's campus renovation as described in section 1981 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for children's campus renovation described under section 1981 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 512. Funds appropriated in part 1 for nurse workforce development must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for nurse workforce development as described in section 1986 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for nurse workforce development described under section 1986 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 513. Funds appropriated in part 1 for maternal-fetal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 medicine programming must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for maternal-fetal medicine programming as described in section 2005 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for maternal-fetal medicine programming described under section 2005 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 514. Funds appropriated in part 1 for mental health services and community outreach must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for mental health services and community outreach as described in section 2007 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for mental health services and community outreach described under section 2007 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 515. Funds appropriated in part 1 for mobile outreach clinic must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for mobile outreach clinic as described in section 2008 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for mobile outreach clinic described under section 2008 of article 6 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 516. As used in sections 501 to 515, "department" means the department of health and human services. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Sec. 601. Funds appropriated in part 1 for community 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 enhancement grants must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for community enhancement grants as described in sections 1050a, 1050b, 1050c, and 1050d of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for community enhancement grants described under sections 1050a, 1050b, 1050c, and 1050d of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 602. Funds appropriated in part 1 for community museum grants must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for community museum grants as described in section 1008 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for community museum grants described under section 1008 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 603. Funds appropriated in part 1 for symphony orchestra grants must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for symphony orchestra grants as described in section 1043 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for symphony orchestra grants described under section 1043 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 604. Funds appropriated in part 1 for infrastructure grants must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for infrastructure grants as described in sections 1053a and 1053b of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for infrastructure grants described under sections 1053a and 1053b of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 605. Funds appropriated in part 1 for downtown development must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for downtown development as described in section 1011 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for downtown development described under section 1011 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 606. Funds appropriated in part 1 for agricultural tourism hub redevelopment must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for agricultural tourism hub redevelopment as described in section 1001 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for agricultural tourism hub redevelopment described under section 1001 of article 9 of 2024 PA 121. Sec. 607. Funds appropriated in part 1 for talent and growth must be used by the department to address current and future workforce needs and population growth. These funds may be used for the following: (a) The operation of the talent action teams fast track system to provide specialized economic assistance to businesses locating or expanding in this state and developing customized solutions to fill identified talent gaps in key industries. (b) Grants to support industry-led collaboratives, United States Department of Labor approved apprenticeships, and other 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 innovative sector strategies in key industries to support the creation of good and promising jobs that make this state's economy more resilient by addressing talent shortages in current and future growth sectors in every region of the state. Grant funds may be used for, but are not limited to, training and activities proposed by the employer-led collaboratives to address identified workforce needs, identify barriers, and support solutions for barrier removal. (c) To collaborate with institutions of higher education, community colleges, Michigan works agencies, private training providers, nonprofit entities, organized labor, state agencies, and local units of government on this program. Services may include, but are not limited to, assistance in the recruitment of talent to this state, facilitating contracting with third parties to provide workforce training, recruitment, and screening of job seekers on behalf of qualified businesses, scholarships and resources for individuals qualifying for in-demand occupations, and identifying barriers and supporting solutions for barrier removal. (d) Growth programs and activities including, but not limited to, growth pilots across the state, research and polling, engagement efforts for growth, and strategies to support talent attraction and retention. (e) Not more than 5% of the funds appropriated for talent and growth may be retained by the department for administration. Sec. 608. Funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan innovation fund must be expended for activities as described under 2024 PA 188, 2024 PA 189, and 2024 PA 190. Sec. 609. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, federal HUD-CPD community development block grant funding is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriated to complete all program activities from prior program years ending with the 2022 program allocation per Executive Reorganization Order No. 2023-1, MCL 125.1999. These funds may be expended for the community development block grant program and administration of the program. As used in this section, "HUD-CPD" means the Office of Community Planning and Development within the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. Sec. 610. As used in sections 601 to 609, "department" means the department of labor and economic opportunity. LEGISLATURE Sec. 701. Funds appropriated in part 1 for national association dues must be allocated in the same manner as an amount appropriated for national association dues as described in section 603 of article 5 of 2024 PA 121. The total amount allocated under this section must not exceed the unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining on September 30, 2025 from appropriations for national association dues described under section 603 of article 5 of 2024 PA 121. DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS Sec. 801. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10), funds appropriated in part 1 for renewable energy and electrification infrastructure enhancement and development must be expended only for grants to businesses, nonprofit organizations, and units of local or state government for the purpose of planning, developing, designing, acquiring, or constructing renewable energy and electrification infrastructure projects. (2) To the extent possible, grants under this section for 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 electric vehicle fast-charging infrastructure should be awarded with a goal of distributing 50% of the total amount of such grants for charging ports with 2 connectors that provide charging at a power level of at least 200 kilowatts and 50% of the total amount of such grants for charging ports with 2 connectors that deliver charging at a power level of at least 350 kilowatts. (3) The Michigan public service commission shall develop guidelines for the grant program described in subsection (1) and implement an application process for the grant program not later than 6 months after the effective date of this act and must first prioritize and approve grants that meet the goals of the governor's MI healthy climate plan. (4) Applicants for a grant under this section must perform an impact study that includes an analysis of potential cost savings, environmental impacts, and local economic benefits of the applicant's proposed renewable energy and electrification infrastructure project. A utility, at its sole discretion, may prepare a single impact study that covers the utility's service territory that accounts for likely proposals, evaluates regional opportunities, and minimizes or eliminates the need for repetitive studies. Sufficient detail must be provided in the study to allow the Michigan public service commission to evaluate each proposed project, including how the proposed project will align with the governor's MI healthy climate plan. (5) An applicant that applies for a grant to be used to develop RNG infrastructure shall include all of the following information in the applicant's application: (a) The project details, including the location of biogas and the proposed interconnection. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) The cost estimates for the interconnection, metering, and gas conditioning equipment needed to connect to an existing pipeline system. (c) A summary of the environmental and health impacts of the project, including the forecasted emission reductions. (d) Any local economic impact from the RNG infrastructure development. (e) The end-use application for the RNG infrastructure with a focus on projects being used for opportunities in this state. (6) After receipt of an application under this section, the Michigan public service commission shall allow local units of government, environmental groups, and business interests directly affected by the proposal 45 days to review the application and provide comments. The Michigan public service commission shall allow the applicant not less than 15 days after the comments have been received from interested parties, at the applicant's discretion, to modify or maintain the applicant's initial proposal. (7) The Michigan public service commission shall review all proposals and award grants to applicants it determines have met the criteria in this section. All grants must include full and timely cost recovery from the Michigan public service commission for the infrastructure requirements of the affected utility made necessary by the grant. All grants must be awarded on a competitive basis with priority given to applicants in a distressed area. As used in this subsection, "distressed area" means any of the following: (a) An area in a city, village, or township that has been designated as blighted. (b) A city, village, or township with a poverty rate and unemployment rate greater than the statewide average. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) An area certified as a neighborhood enterprise zone under the neighborhood enterprise zone act, 1992 PA 147, MCL 207.771 to 207.786. (d) An area facing a disproportionate environmental burden, using the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy's MiEJScreen or EPA's EJSCREEN. (8) Not later than 30 days after the completion of the relevant project, grant recipients under this section shall submit a report to the Michigan public service commission that details how the grant money was used. (9) The funds appropriated in part 1 for renewable energy and electrification infrastructure enhancement and development must not be used to expand the use of conventional natural gas. (10) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for renewable energy and electrification infrastructure enhancement and development, the Michigan public service commission shall not use more than $125,000.00, upon awarding of the grants, for administrative-related expenses incurred by the commission for the operation of the grant program. Funds supporting the grant program are appropriated in the Michigan public service commission upon awarding of the grants. (11) As used in this section: (a) "Renewable energy and electrification infrastructure projects" includes, but is not limited to, renewable natural gas facilities and electric vehicle fast-charging infrastructure upgrades on publicly owned land within 1/2 mile of a United States highway or state trunkline roadway. (b) "Renewable natural gas" or "RNG" means methane derived from organic material and degradable carbon sources, including, but 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 not limited to, carbon sources and materials sourced from municipal solid waste, septage feedstock, plant materials, or food waste. Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan indigent defense commission grants, it is the intent of the legislature that the Michigan indigent defense commission begin the statutory process of developing and implementing minimum standards for youth defense services. This process would include the planning and determining needs under the Michigan indigent defense commission act, 2013 PA 93, MCL 780.981 to 780.1003. Sec. 803. A grant distributed by the Michigan indigent defense commission must not be used by an indigent defense system to support any construction expenses for a new structure. This section does not prohibit expenditures for renovations to existing structures, if such a renovation is part of an indigent criminal defense system's approved compliance plan. Sec. 804. As used in sections 801 to 803, "department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET Sec. 1001. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for menstrual products, the MDTMB shall provide free menstrual discharge absorption devices in the restrooms of buildings and facilities that are owned or managed by the MDTMB. To the extent possible, the MDTMB shall encourage the provision of menstrual discharge absorption devices in buildings and facilities that are leased by the MDTMB. Sec. 1002. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for information technology investment fund must be used for the modernization of state information technology systems, improvement 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of this state's cybersecurity framework, and to achieve efficiencies. (2) The MDTMB shall develop a plan regarding the use of the funds appropriated in part 1 for the information technology investment fund. (3) The plan described in subsection (2) must include all of the following: (a) A description of proposed information technology investment projects. (b) The time frame for completion of the information technology investment projects. (c) The initial budgeted amount for each project. (d) The number of employees assigned to implement each information technology investment project. (e) The contracts entered into for each information technology investment project. (f) Any other information the MDTMB considers necessary. (4) The MDTMB shall submit a report to the standard report recipients that includes the plan and the anticipated spending reductions or overages for each of the proposed information technology investment projects. The report must also include both of the following: (a) A comparison of the initial budgeted amounts and cumulative costs, both by project and in total for all projects. (b) The amount of any transfer of budgeted funds from 1 project to another. Sec. 1003. (1) The make it in Michigan competitiveness fund is created within the state treasury. (2) Funds may be spent from the make it in Michigan 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 competitiveness fund only on appropriation or administrative transfer pursuant to subsection (3). (3) A transfer of funds from federal or state restricted contingency funds into make it in Michigan competitiveness fund may be made by the state budget director not less than 30 days after notifying each member of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees. Those transfers may be disapproved by either appropriations committee within the 30 days and, if disapproved within that time, are not effective. (4) A transfer approved under this section constitutes authorization to transfer the amount recommended and approved. However, the amount must be reduced by the state budget director to be within the current unobligated amount of the appropriation. (5) Transfers must not be authorized under any of the following circumstances: (a) To create a new line-item appropriation or to create a new state program. (b) To or from an operating appropriation line item that did not appear in the fiscal year appropriation bills for which the transfer is being made. (c) To or from a work project as designated under section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a. (d) Between state governmental funds. (6) Interest and earnings from the investment of funds deposited in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund must be deposited in the general fund. (7) Funds in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund at the close of a fiscal year remain in the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund and do not lapse to the general fund. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (8) Funds appropriated or transferred from the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund are available to leverage federal funding opportunities that include, but are not limited to, infrastructure, health, public safety, mobility and electrification, climate and the environment, economic development, or other funding opportunities administered by the federal government. Funding opportunities may be in the form of formula or competitive-based grants, cooperative agreements, or contracts, and may include funds contained in the infrastructure investment and jobs act, Public Law 117-58, the CHIPS act of 2022, division A of Public Law 117-167, the inflation reduction act of 2022, Public Law 117-169, or any other federal acts. (9) The Michigan infrastructure office, in collaboration with the state budget director, shall form an interagency evaluation committee that includes the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy, the department of labor and economic opportunity, the state transportation department, the Michigan strategic fund, or other entities at the discretion of the Michigan infrastructure office, to develop program guidelines and selection criteria for the recommended appropriation or transfer of funds. The interagency evaluation committee shall make recommendations to the director of the MDTMB and the state budget director on the disbursement of funds. Funding must also be used to cover all costs related to the administration of this section. (10) The MDTMB shall inform the legislature not later than 30 days after any federal funds are received that would be used as the basis for recommended appropriations or transfers from the make it in Michigan competitiveness fund. (11) Not later than 90 days after the close of each fiscal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 year, the MDTMB shall report to the legislature on the projects funded with make it in Michigan competitiveness fund money. Sec. 1004. As used in sections 1001 to 1003, "MDTMB" means the department of technology, management, and budget. STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT Sec. 1101. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for school zone automated speed enforcement pilot project, the department shall develop and implement an automated school zone speed enforcement pilot project. The purpose of the project is to determine the effectiveness of automated speed enforcement technology combined with a public education and information campaign. (2) In implementing the pilot project program under this section, the department shall partner with a private industry consultant. The private industry consultant shall do all of the following: (a) Partner with a local police agency and local municipality. (b) Adhere to national Criminal Justice Information Services guidelines. (c) Have facilities and practices audited annually. (d) Have a strategic partnership with the National Law Enforcement Telecommunication System (NLETS). (3) The department shall submit a report on the pilot project to the standard report recipients not later than 60 days after project completion. The report must include a description of project methodology, findings, and recommendations. (4) As used in this section, "department" means the state transportation department. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 1201. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the Michigan infrastructure council shall plan, conduct, and contract for asset management improvement activities, including, but not limited to, any of the following: (a) Infrastructure data collection activities. (b) Asset manager training. (c) Development of a 30-year asset management plan for this state. (d) Assistance in asset management improvement projects, including maintaining an asset management portal. (e) Any other projects that promote improved asset management for infrastructure in this state.